pt-PT: Firmeza do material: Flexível; Duro; Rígido; Semirrígido; Suave; Outro
da: Materialefasthed: Fleksibel; Hård; Stiv; Halvstiv; Blød; Andet
en: Material firmness: Flexible; Hard; Rigid; Semi-rigid; Soft; Other
fr: Fermeté du matériau: Flexible; Difficile; Rigide; Vinyle semi-rigide; Doux; Autre
bg-BG: Твърдост на материала: Гъвкав; Твърд; Издържлив; Полутвърд; Мек; Други
ko: 소재 견고성: 유연함; 하드; 강체; 반강체; 부드러움; 기타
sl-SI: Trdota materiala: Prilagodljivo; Trden; Tog; Poltog; Mehko; Drugo
lt-LT: Medžiagos tvirtumas: Lanksti; Kieta; Tvirta; Pusiau tvirta; Minkšta; Kita
nl: Stevigheid materiaal: Flexibel; Hard; Onbuigzaam; Halfstijf; Zacht; Andere
tr: Malzeme Sağlamlığı: Esnek; Sert; Bükülmez; Yarı sert; Yumuşak; Diğer
vi: Độ rắn chắc của vật liệu: Mềm dẻo; Cứng; Rắn; Bán cứng; Mềm; Khác
hu: Anyag szilárdsága: Rugalmas; Kemény; Merev; Félmerev; Puha; Egyéb
de: Materialfestigkeit: Flexibel; Hart; Starr; Halbstarr; Weich; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 材質硬度: 柔韌; 硬; 剛性; 半剛性; 柔軟; 其他
nb: Materialfasthet: Fleksibel; Hard; Rigid; Halvstiv; Myk; Annet
zh-CN: 材质坚固度: 灵活式; 硬; 刚性; 半刚性; 软; 其他
pl: Sztywność materiału: Elastyczne; Twardy; Sztywna; Półsztywny; Miękki; Inne
pt-BR: Firmeza dos materiais: Flexível; Duro; Rígida; Semirrígido; Macio; Outro
sk-SK: Pevnosť materiálu: Flexibilný; Ťažký; Pevný; Polotuhý; Mäkký; Iné
fi: Materiaalin lujuus: Joustava; Kova; Jäykkä; Puolijäykkä; Pehmeä; Muu
es: Firmeza del material: Flexible; Duro; Rígido; Semirrígido; Blando; Otros
cs: Pevnost materiálu: Pružná; Tvrdá; Pevná; Polotuhý vinyl; Měkká; Jiné
sv: Materialfasthet: Flexibel; Hård; Styv; Halvstyv; Mjuk; Övrigt
ro-RO: Fermitatea materialului: Flexibil; Dur; Rigid; Semi-rigid; Moale; Altele
el: Ακαμψία υλικού: Εύκαμπτο; Σκληρή; Άκαμπτο; Ημιάκαμπτο; Μαλακό; Άλλο
hr-HR: Čvrstoća materijala: Fleksibilni; Tvrdo; Kruti; Polukruto; Meki; Ostalo
th: ความแน่นของวัสดุ: ขอบยืดหยุ่น; แข็ง; ขอบแข็ง; กึ่งแข็ง; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
ja: 素材の硬さ: フレキシブル; ハード; 硬質; 半硬質; ソフト; その他
it: Solidità del materiale: Flessibile; Dura; Rigido; Semirigido; Morbida; Altro
ru: Жесткость материала: Гибкий; Твердый; Жесткий; Полужесткий; Мягкий; Другой